Vermont, session 2025-2026, H584.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5811 is amended to read:
§ 5811. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
* * *
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
VT LEG #386326 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.584
2026 Page 2 of 3
* * *
(iv) the portion of certain retirement income and federally taxable
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act that is required to be
excluded under section 5830e of this chapter;
(v) the amount of any federal deduction or credit that the taxpayer
would have been allowed for the cultivation, testing, processing, or sale of
cannabis or cannabis products as authorized under 7 V.S.A. chapter 33 or 37,
but for 26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
(vi) the amount of interest paid by a qualified resident taxpayer
during the taxable year on a qualified education loan for the costs of attendance
at an eligible educational institution; and
(vii) any pension or survivor benefit income received from a U.S.
state or municipality relating to service as a police officer, firefighter, or
emergency medical technician; and
* * *
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5813 is amended to read:
§ 5813. STATUTORY PURPOSES
* * *
(bb) The statutory purpose of the exemption of pension and survivor
benefit income in subdivision 5811(21)(B)(vii) of this title is to lessen the tax
VT LEG #386326 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.584
2026 Page 3 of 3
burden on Vermonters who derive part of their income from benefits for public
safety professionals.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2026, and apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1,
2026.
VT LEG #386326 v.1